Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 1

General Provisions

61-3-101. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Active and in good standing as reflected in the records of the secretary of state” means a corporation, limited liability company, or partnership that is in existence, registered or authorized to transact business in this state as reflected in the records of the secretary of state; and in the case of a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership, such entity is in good standing with the department of revenue;

“Certificate of limited partnership”:

Means the certificate required by § 61-3-201; and

Includes the certificate as amended or restated;

“Contribution,” except when used in the phrase “right of contribution”, means property or a benefit described in § 61-3-501 that is provided by a person to a limited partnership to become a partner or in the person's capacity as a partner;

“Debtor in bankruptcy” means a person that is the subject of:

An order for relief under 11 U.S.C. § 101 et seq. or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application; or

A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency;

“Distribution”:

Means a direct or indirect transfer of money or other property by a limited partnership, except for the issuance of its own partnership interests, with or without consideration, or an incurrence or issuance of indebtedness, whether directly or indirectly, including through a guaranty to or for the benefit of any of its partners in respect of partnership interests;

Includes interim distribution or a liquidation distribution; a purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of its partnership interests; of a distribution indebtedness, which includes the incurrence of indebtedness, whether directly or indirectly, including through a guaranty, for the benefit of the limited partnership's partners; or any other transaction;

Does not mean amounts paid to or for the benefit of partners as compensation or benefits for services rendered by the partners in their capacities as partners, agents, or independent contractors;

“Foreign limited liability limited partnership” means a foreign limited partnership whose general partners have limited liability for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the foreign partnership under a provision similar to § 61-3-404(c);

“Foreign limited partnership”:

Means an unincorporated entity formed under the laws of a jurisdiction other than this state that would be a limited partnership if formed under the laws of this state; and

Includes a foreign limited liability limited partnership;

“General partner” means a person that:

Has become a general partner under § 61-3-401 or was a general partner in a partnership when the partnership became subject to this chapter; and

Has not dissociated as a general partner under § 61-3-603;

“Good standing with the department of revenue” means the secretary of state has received and verified through electronic confirmation or a certificate of tax clearance issued by the commissioner of revenue that a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership is current on all fees, taxes, and penalties to the satisfaction of the commissioner;

“Jurisdiction,” used to refer to a political entity, means the United States, a state, a foreign country, or a political subdivision of a foreign country;

“Jurisdiction of formation” means the jurisdiction whose laws govern the internal affairs of an entity;

“Letter of good standing from the department of revenue” means a letter issued by the department of revenue that a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership is current on all fees, taxes, and penalties to the satisfaction of the commissioner;

“Limited liability limited partnership,” except when used in the phrase “foreign limited liability limited partnership” and in part 11 of this chapter, means a limited partnership whose certificate of limited partnership states that the partnership is a limited liability limited partnership;

“Limited partner” means a person that:

Has become a limited partner under § 61-3-301 or was a limited partner in the partnership when the partnership became subject to this chapter; and

Has not been dissociated under § 61-3-601;

“Limited partnership”, except in the phrase “foreign limited partnership” and in part 11 of this chapter:

Means an entity formed under this chapter or which becomes subject to this chapter under part 11 of this chapter or § 61-3-1207; and

Includes a limited liability limited partnership;

“Partner” means a limited partner or general partner;

“Partnership agreement”:

Means the agreement, whether or not referred to as a partnership agreement and whether oral, implied, in a record, or in any combination thereof, of all the partners of a limited partnership concerning the matters described in § 61-3-104(a); and

Includes the agreement as amended or restated;

“Person” means an individual, business corporation, nonprofit corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, cooperative association, unincorporated nonprofit association, statutory trust, business trust, common-law business trust, estate, trust, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“Principal office” means the principal executive office of a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership, whether or not the office is located in this state;

“Property” means all property, whether real, personal, mixed, or tangible or intangible, or any right or interest in such property;

“Record,” when used as a noun, means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“Registered agent” means an agent of a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership who is authorized to receive service of any process or notice required or permitted by law to be served on the partnership;

“Registered foreign limited partnership” means a foreign limited partnership that is registered to do business in this state pursuant to a statement of registration filed by the secretary of state;

“Required information” means the information that a limited partnership is required to maintain under § 61-3-107;

“Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States; and

“Transfer” includes:

An assignment;

A conveyance;

A sale;

A lease;

An encumbrance, including a mortgage or security interest;

A gift; and

A transfer by operation of law.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, § 1.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added the definitions of “active and in good standing as reflected in the records of the secretary of state”, “good standing with the department of revenue”, and “letter of good standing from the department of revenue”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-102. Knowledge — notice.

A person knows a fact if the person:

Has actual knowledge of it; or

Is deemed to know it under law other than this chapter.

A person has notice of a fact if the person:

Has reason to know the fact from all the facts known to the person at the time in question; or

Is deemed to have notice of the fact under subsection (c) or (d).

A certificate of limited partnership filed with the secretary of state is notice that the partnership is a limited partnership and that the persons designated in the certificate as general partners are general partners. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), the certificate is not notice of any other fact not set out in this subsection (c).

A person who is not a partner, is deemed to have notice of:

A person's dissociation as a general partner the earlier of:

Ninety (90) days after an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership stating that the other person has dissociated becomes effective; or

Ninety (90) days after a statement of dissociation pertaining to the other person becomes effective;

A limited partnership's:

Dissolution ninety (90) days after an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership stating that the limited partnership is dissolved becomes effective; termination ninety (90) days after a statement of termination under § 61-3-802(b)(1)(B) becomes effective; and

Participation in a merger, conversion, or domestication, ninety (90) days after articles of merger, conversion, or domestication under part 11 of this chapter become effective.

Subject to § 61-3-209(f), a person notifies another person of a fact by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not those steps cause the other person to know the fact.

A general partner's knowledge or notice of a fact relating to the limited partnership is effective immediately as knowledge of or notice to the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of the general partner. A limited partner's knowledge or notice of a fact relating to the partnership is not effective as knowledge of or notice to the partnership.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, § 2.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “§ 61-3-802(b)(1)(B)” for “§ 61-3-802(b)(2)(F)” in (d)(2)(A).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-103. Governing law.

The law of this state governs:

The internal affairs of a limited partnership; and

The liability of a partner as partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited partnership.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-104. Partnership agreement — Scope, function, and limitations.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d), the partnership agreement governs:

Relations among the partners as partners and between the partners and the limited partnership;

The activities and affairs of the partnership and the conduct of those activities and affairs; and

The means and conditions for amending the partnership agreement.

To the extent the partnership agreement does not provide for a matter described in subsection (a), this chapter governs the matter.

A partnership agreement shall not:

Vary the law applicable under § 61-3-103;

Vary a limited partnership's capacity under § 61-3-110 to sue and be sued in its own name;

Vary § 61-3-204;

Vary the right of a general partner under § 61-3-406(b)(2) to vote on or consent to an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership deleting a statement that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership;

Vary the notice requirements under § 61-3-102 or under this chapter in a manner that is manifestly unreasonable;

Vary the requirements with respect to the limited partnership's name under § 61-3-112;

Vary the requirement under § 61-3-119 regarding the Workers' Compensation Law, compiled in title 50, chapter 6;

Eliminate or vary the restrictions on reimbursement and indemnification contained in § 61-3-408(a) and (b);

Eliminate or vary the potential for personal liability of a general partner under § 61-3-404;

Eliminate or vary this section;

Eliminate or vary the limitations on distributions in § 61-3-504;

Eliminate or vary the liability for unlawful distributions in § 61-3-505;

Unreasonably restrict a right to information or access to records under § 61-3-304 or § 61-3-407;

Eliminate or restrict the duty of loyalty under § 61-3-409(b)(1) or (b)(2), except to the extent provided by subsection (d);

Unreasonably reduce the duty of care under § 61-3-409;

Eliminate the obligation of good faith and fair dealing under § 61-3-305(a) and § 61-3-409(d), but the partnership agreement may determine standards by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured, if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable;

Vary the grounds for expulsion specified in § 61-3-603(5)(B);

Vary the power of person to dissociate as a general partner under § 61-3-604(a), except to require that the notice under § 61-3-603(1) be in a record;

Vary the causes of dissolution specified in § 61-3-801(a)(6);

Vary the requirement to wind up the partnership's activities and affairs as specified in § 61-3-802(a), (b)(1)(B), and (d);

Vary the provisions of § 61-3-905, but the partnership agreement may provide that the partnership shall not have a special litigation committee;

Vary any requirements relating to documents required to be filed with the secretary of state or any register of deeds, or otherwise vary or restrict any other rights of the secretary of state or any register of deeds; and

Except as provided in §§ 61-3-105 and 61-3-106(b), vary or restrict any rights of any person under this chapter, other than a partner.

Without limiting other terms that may be included in a partnership agreement, the following applies:

The partnership agreement may:

Specify the method by which a specific act or transaction that would otherwise violate the duty of loyalty may be authorized or ratified by one (1) or more disinterested and independent persons after full disclosure of all material facts; and

Alter the prohibition in § 61-3-504(a)(2) so that the prohibition requires only that the partnership's total assets not be less than the sum of its total liabilities; and

If not manifestly unreasonable, the partnership agreement may:

Alter or eliminate the aspects of the duty of loyalty stated in § 61-3-409(b)(1) or (b)(2);

Identify specific types or categories of activities that do not violate the duty of loyalty;

Alter the duty of care, but shall not authorize conduct involving bad faith, willful or intentional misconduct, or knowing violation of law; and

Alter or eliminate any other fiduciary duty.

The court shall decide as a matter of law whether a term of a partnership agreement is manifestly unreasonable under subdivision (c)(5), (c)(16), or (d)(2). The court:

Shall make its determination as of the time the challenged term became part of the partnership agreement and by considering only circumstances existing at that time; and

May invalidate the term only if, in light of the purposes, activities, and affairs of the limited partnership, it is readily apparent that:

The objective of the term is unreasonable; or

The term is an unreasonable means to achieve its objective.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, § 3.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “§ 61-3-802(a), (b)(1)(B), and (d)” for “§ 61-3-802(a), (b)(1), and (d)” in (c)(20).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-105. Partnership agreement — Effect on limited partnership and person becoming partner — Preformation agreement.

A limited partnership is bound by and may enforce the partnership agreement, whether or not the partnership has itself manifested assent to the agreement.

A person that becomes a partner is deemed to assent to the partnership agreement.

Two (2) or more persons intending to become the initial partners of a limited partnership may make an agreement providing that upon the formation of the partnership, the agreement shall become the partnership agreement.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-106. Partnership agreement — Effect on third parties and relationship to records effective on behalf of limited partnership.

A partnership agreement may specify that its amendment requires the approval of a person who is not a party to the agreement or the satisfaction of a condition. An amendment is ineffective if its adoption does not include the required approval or satisfy the specified condition.

The obligations of a limited partnership and its partners to a person in the person's capacity as a transferee or person dissociated as a partner are governed by the partnership agreement. Subject only to a court order issued under § 61-3-703(b)(2) to effectuate a charging order, an amendment to the partnership agreement made after a person becomes a transferee or is dissociated as a partner:

Is effective with regard to any debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership or its partners to the person in the person's capacity as a transferee or person dissociated as a partner; and

Is not effective to the extent the amendment imposes a new debt, obligation, or other liability on the transferee or person dissociated as a partner.

If a record delivered by a limited partnership to the secretary of state for filing becomes effective and contains a provision that would be ineffective under § 61-3-104(c) if contained in the partnership agreement, the provision is ineffective in the record.

Subject to subsection (c), if a record delivered by a limited partnership to the secretary of state for filing becomes effective and conflicts with the partnership agreement:

The agreement prevails as to partners, persons dissociated as partners, and transferees; and

The record prevails as to other persons to the extent they reasonably rely on the record.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-107. Required information.

A limited partnership shall maintain at its principal office the following information:

A current list showing the full name and last known street and mailing address, including zip codes, of each partner, separately identifying the general partners, and the limited partners;

A copy of the initial certificate of limited partnership and all amendments to and restatements of the certificate, together with signed copies of any powers of attorney under which any certificate, amendment, or restatement has been signed;

A copy of any filed articles of merger or conversion;

A copy of the partnership's federal, state, and local income tax returns and reports, if any, for the three (3) most recent years;

A copy of any partnership agreement made in a record and any amendment made in a record to any partnership agreement;

A copy of any financial statement of the partnership for the three (3) most recent years;

A copy of the three (3) most recent annual reports delivered by the partnership to the secretary of state pursuant to § 61-3-211;

A copy of any record made by the partnership during the past three (3) years of any consent given by or vote taken of any partner pursuant to this chapter or the partnership agreement; and

Unless contained in a partnership agreement made in a record, a record stating:

A description and statement of the agreed value of contributions other than money made and agreed to be made by each partner;

The times at which, or events on the happening of which, any additional contributions agreed to be made by each partner are to be made;

For any person that is both a general partner and a limited partner, a specification of what transferable interest the person owns in each capacity; and

Any events upon the happening of which the partnership is to be dissolved and its activities and affairs wound up.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-108. Dual capacity.

A person may be both a general partner and a limited partner. A person that is both a general and limited partner has the rights, powers, duties, and obligations provided by this chapter and the partnership agreement in each of those capacities. When the person acts as a general partner, the person is subject to the obligations, duties, and restrictions under this chapter and the partnership agreement for general partners. When the person acts as a limited partner, the person is subject to the obligations, duties, and restrictions under this chapter and the partnership agreement for limited partners.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-109. Nature, purpose, and duration of limited partnership.

A limited partnership is an entity distinct from its partners. A limited partnership is the same entity regardless of whether its certificate states that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.

A limited partnership may have any lawful purpose, regardless of whether for profit.

A limited partnership has perpetual duration.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-110. Powers.

A limited partnership has the capacity to sue and be sued in the name of the partnership and the power to do all things necessary or convenient to carry on the partnership's activities and affairs.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-111. Supplemental principles of law.

Unless displaced by this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-112. Permitted names.

The name of a limited partnership may contain the name of any partner, but must not contain the phrases “corporation,” “incorporated,” “limited liability company,” or abbreviations of like import.

The name of a limited partnership that is not a limited liability limited partnership must contain the phrase “limited partnership” or the abbreviation “LP” or “L.P.” and must not contain the phrase “limited liability limited partnership” or the abbreviation “LLLP” or “L.L.L.P.”.

The name of a limited liability limited partnership must contain the phrase “limited liability limited partnership” or the abbreviation “LLLP” or “L.L.L.P.” and must not contain the abbreviation “LP” or “L.P.”.

The name of a limited partnership, and the name under which a foreign limited partnership may register to do business in this state, must be distinguishable on the records of the secretary of state from any:

Name of an existing person whose formation required the filing of a record by the secretary of state and which is not at the time administratively dissolved;

Name of a limited liability partnership whose statement of qualification is in effect;

Name under which a person is registered to do business in this state by the filing of a record by the secretary of state;

Name reserved under § 61-3-113 or other law of this state providing for the reservation of a name by the filing of a record by the secretary of state; and

Name registered under § 61-3-114 or other law of this state providing for the registration of a name by the filing of a record by the secretary of state.

A domestic or foreign limited partnership, or person acting on behalf of a limited partnership not yet formed, may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon the secretary of state's records from one (1) or more of the names described in subsection (d). The secretary of state shall authorize use of the indistinguishable name applied for, if:

The person holding the right to use the previously filed name described in subsection (d) consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking, in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state, to cancel its reservation of the name or change the name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of the applicant;

The applicant delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's right to use the name applied for in this state; or

The person holding the right to use the previously filed name described in subsection (d) consents in writing to the use of the name by the applicant, and both the other person and the applicant consent in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state to use the same registered agent.

In determining whether a name is the same as or not distinguishable on the records of the secretary of state from the name of another person, words, phrases, or abbreviations indicating the type of person, such as “corporation”, “corp.”, “incorporated”, “Inc.”, “professional corporation”, “PC”, “P.C.”, “professional association”, “PA”, “P.A.”, “Limited”, “Ltd.”, “limited partnership”, “LP”, “L.P.”, “limited liability partnership”, “LLP”, “L.L.P.”, “registered limited liability partnership”, “RLLP”, “R.L.L.P.”, “limited liability limited partnership”, “LLLP”, “L.L.L.P.”, “registered limited liability limited partnership”, “RLLLP”, “R.L.L.L.P.”, “limited liability company”, “LLC”, “L.L.C.”, “limited cooperative association”, “limited cooperative”, “LCA”, or “L.C.A.” must not be taken into account.

The name of a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership must not contain language stating or implying that the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership:

Transacts or has the power to transact any business for which authorization, in whatever form and however denominated, is required under the laws of this state, unless the appropriate commission or official has granted the authorization and certifies that fact to the secretary of state in writing;

Is formed as, affiliated with or sponsored by, any fraternal, veterans', service, religious, charitable or professional organization, unless the formation, affiliation or sponsorship is certified in writing to the secretary of state by the body authorizing the formation or the organization with which affiliation or sponsorship is claimed, as applicable; or

Is an agency or instrumentality of, affiliated with or sponsored by the United States, any state, or a subdivision or agency of the United States, unless the fact is certified in writing to the secretary of state by the appropriate official of the United States, the state, or the subdivision or agency, as applicable.

A limited partnership or foreign limited partnership may use a name that is not distinguishable from a name described in subdivisions (d)(1)-(5) if the partnership delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the right of the partnership to use the name in this state.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-113. Reservation of name.

A person may reserve the exclusive use of a name that complies with § 61-3-112 by delivering an application to the secretary of state for filing. The application must state the name and address of the applicant and the name to be reserved. If the secretary of state finds that the name is available, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the applicant's exclusive use for one hundred twenty (120) days.

The owner of a reserved name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the secretary of state a signed notice in a record of the transfer which states the name and address of the person to which the reservation is being transferred.

The reservation of a specific name may be cancelled by filing with the secretary of state a notice, executed by the applicant or transferee, specifying the name reservation to be cancelled and the name and address of the applicant or transferee.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-114. Registration of name.

A foreign limited partnership not registered to do business in this state under part 10 of this chapter may register its name, or an alternate name adopted pursuant to § 61-3-1006, if the name is distinguishable on the records of the secretary of state from the names that are not available under § 61-3-112.

To register its name or an alternate name adopted pursuant to § 61-3-1006, a foreign limited partnership must deliver to the secretary of state for filing an application:

Stating the partnership's name, the jurisdiction and date of its formation, and any alternate name adopted pursuant to § 61-3-1006; and

Accompanied by a certificate of existence, or a document of similar import, from the jurisdiction of formation, bearing a date that is not more than one (1) month prior to the date the application is filed with the secretary of state.

lf the secretary of state finds that the name applied for is available, the secretary of state must register the name for the applicant's exclusive use.

The registration of a name under this section is effective for one (1) year after the date of registration.

A foreign limited partnership whose name registration is effective may renew the registration for successive one-year periods by delivering, not earlier than three (3) months before the expiration of the registration, to the secretary of state for filing a renewal application that complies with this section. When filed, the renewal application renews the registration for a succeeding one-year period.

A foreign limited partnership whose name registration is effective may register as a foreign limited partnership under the registered name or consent in a signed record to the use of that name by another person that is not an individual.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, § 4.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in (b), divided the former first sentence as the present introductory clause and (b)(1)(A) by substituting “application: (A) Stating the” for “application stating the”, added present (b)(1)(B), and redesignated the former last sentence as present (b)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-115. Registered agent.

Each limited partnership and each registered foreign limited partnership shall designate and maintain a registered agent in this state. The designation of a registered agent is an affirmation of fact by the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership that the agent has consented to be served.

A registered agent for a limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership must have a place of business in this state.

The only duties under this chapter of a registered agent that has complied with this chapter are:

To forward to the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership at the address most recently supplied to the agent by the partnership or foreign partnership any process, notice, or demand pertaining to the partnership or foreign partnership which is served on or received by the agent;

If the registered agent resigns, to provide the notice required by § 61-3-117(a)(4) to the partnership or foreign partnership at the address most recently supplied to the agent by the partnership or foreign partnership; and

To keep current the information with respect to the agent in the certificate of limited partnership.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-116. Change of registered agent or address for registered agent by limited partnership.

A limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership may change its registered agent or the address of its registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change that states:

The name of the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership;

The street address of its current registered office;

If the current registered office is to be changed, the street address of the new registered office and zip code for the office, and the county in which the office is located;

The name of its current registered agent; and

If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of the new registered agent.

The general or limited partners of a limited partnership need not approve the delivery to the secretary of state for filing of:

A statement of change under this section; or

A similar filing changing the registered agent or registered office, if any, of the partnership in any other jurisdiction.

A statement of change under this section designating a new registered agent is an affirmation of fact by the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership that the agent has consented to serve.

As an alternative to using the procedure in this section, a limited partnership may amend its certificate of limited partnership.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-117. Resignation of registered agent.

A registered agent may resign as an agent for a limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of resignation that states:

The name of the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership;

The name of the agent;

That the agent resigns from serving as registered agent for the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership; and

A certification that the registered agent has mailed a copy of the statement to the principal office of the limited partnership by certified mail.

The agency appointment is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the date on which the statement is filed by the secretary of state. When a statement of resignation takes effect, the registered agent ceases to have responsibility under this chapter for any matter thereafter tendered to it as agent for the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership. The resignation does not affect any contractual rights the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership has against the agent or that the agent has against the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership.

A registered agent may resign with respect to a limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership whether or not the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership is active and in good standing as reflected in the records of the secretary of state.

If a registered agent resigns or is unable to perform its duties, the designating limited partnership must, not later than sixty (60) days after the resignation or discovery that the agent is unable to perform its duties, designate another registered agent to the end that it shall at all times have a registered agent in this state.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, § 5.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “is active and in good standing as reflected in the records of the secretary of state” for “is in good standing” at the end of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

61-3-118. Change of name or address by registered agent.

If a registered agent changes the street address of the registered agent's business office, the agent shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change that states:

The name of the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership represented by the registered agent;

The name of the agent as currently shown in the records of the secretary of state for the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership; and

The agent's new street address including the zip code of its new registered office; and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the new registered office; and the county in which the office is located.

A registered agent shall promptly furnish notice to the represented limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership of the filing by the secretary of state of the statement of change and the changes made by the statement.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, § 6.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in (a), substituted “the street address of the registered agent's business office” for “its name or address” in the introductory language; rewrote (3) which read: “If the name of the agent has changed, the agent’s new name; and”; and deleted former (4) which read: “If the address of the agent has changed, the agent’s new address and a mailing address, such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the agent’s street address.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-119. Service of process, notice, or demand.

A limited partnership's registered agent is the limited partnership's agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the limited partnership.

The secretary of state shall be an agent of a limited partnership upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served when:

A domestic or foreign limited partnership authorized to do business in this state fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state;

Its registered agent cannot be found with reasonable diligence;

A foreign limited partnership transacts business or conducts affairs in this state without first submitting an application for registration with the secretary of state; or

The registration of a foreign limited partnership has been cancelled.

Whenever a domestic or foreign limited partnership authorized to do business in this state is an employer within the meaning of the Workers' Compensation Law, compiled in title 50, chapter 6, and the limited partnership is, for the purpose of workers' compensation, self-insured or a part of a self-insurance pool as provided in title 50, chapter 6, part 4, the limited partnership shall, for workers' compensation actions only, be required to appoint the commissioner of commerce and insurance and the commissioner's chief deputy, or their successors, as its true and lawful attorneys upon either of whom all lawful process in any such action or legal proceeding may be served, as is required of insurance companies by title 56, chapter 2.

This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a limited partnership.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-120. Delivery of record.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, permissible means of delivery of a record include delivery by hand, mail, conventional commercial practice, and electronic transmission.

Delivery to the secretary of state is effective only when a record is received by the secretary of state.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.